Arkansas, session 2025, HB1264.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the University of Arkansas - Fort Smith for the 2025-2026 fiscal year,
the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(1) Chancellor 1 $290,076
(2) Provost 1 $232,104
(3) Vice Chancellor for Univ. Relations 1 $215,850
(4) Vice Chan. for Finance & Administration 1 $215,850
*HAR027*
01/27/2025 1:41:07 PM HAR027

HB1264
(5) Vice Chan. for Advancement/Development 1 $212,570
(6) Vice Chan. for Enrollment Mgmt 1 $212,570
(7) Vice Chancellor for Student Affairs 1 $212,570
(8) Project/Program Administrator 43
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(9) IT Pool 20
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
01/27/2025 1:41:07 PM HAR027

HB1264
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(10) Director of University Communications 1 $193,822
(11) Dir. of Management Info. Systems 1 $188,816
(12) Assoc. Vice Chan. for Finance & Admin. 1 $186,805
(13) Dean 6 $173,915
(14) Assoc. Vice Chan. for Planning & Account 1 $168,029
01/27/2025 1:41:07 PM HAR027

HB1264
(15) Controller 1 $166,632
(16) Assistant Dean 3 $163,388
(17) Dean of Business & Professional Inst. 1 $158,777
(18) Dean of Work Force Development 1 $158,777
(19) Director of Plant Operations / Eng. 1 $156,844
(20) Dean of Instructional Development 1 $156,463
(21) Director of Annual Fund 1 $154,802
(22) Director of Major Gifts 1 $154,802
(23) Director of Planned Giving 1 $154,802
(24) Registrar 1 $152,582
(25) Dir. of Community & Cont. Ed. 1 $147,950
(26) Associate Director of Computing Serv. 4 $144,564
(27) Director of Institutional Research 1 $144,564
(28) Assistant to the Chancellor 1 $141,997
(29) Director of Admissions 1 $132,227
(30) Director of Student Financial Aid 1 $132,227
(31) Assistant Director of Plant Oper. 1 $128,436
(32) Director of Evening & Special Programs 1 $128,224
(33) Director of Media Services 1 $127,503
(34) Director of University Police 1 $122,701
(35) Development Officer 5 $122,528
(36) Budget Director 1 $120,948
(37) Dir. of Placement/Career Services 1 $120,947
(38) Director of Workforce Development 1 $114,149
(39) Director of Sys. Prog. & Database Svcs. 1 $111,761
(40) Director of Academic Support Services 1 $106,742
(41) Dir. of Educational Assessment 1 $106,740
(42) Director of Disability Services 1 $106,607
(43) Administrator of Grants and Contracts 1 $105,718
(44) Development/Advancement Specialist 5 $104,674
(45) Instructional Designer 2 $102,700
(46) Workforce Specialist 4 $93,055
(47) Fiscal Support Pool 18
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
01/27/2025 1:41:07 PM HAR027

HB1264
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(48) Public Safety Pool 15
HE Public Safety Commander III $90,223
Director Public Safety I $88,541
HE Public Safety Commander II $86,753
HE Public Safety Commander I $83,416
HE Public Safety Supervisor $74,157
Public Safety Officer $71,305
Public Safety Officer II $65,925
Security Officer Supervisor $62,208
Public Safety/Security Officer $56,353
HE Public Safety Dispatcher $47,272
Parking Control Supv. $47,272
Security Officer $47,272
Parking Control Officer $45,455
Watchman $38,855
(49) Institutional Assistant 11 $89,980
(50) Procurement Manager 1 $85,136
(51) Academic Advisor 42 $83,172
(52) Public Information Coordinator 1 $81,860
(53) Director of Administrative Support 1 $81,473
(54) Skilled Trades Pool 29
Skilled Trades Foreman $74,157
Skilled Trades Supervisor $71,305
Skilled Tradesman $68,562
Skilled Trades Helper $52,101
Apprentice Tradesman $46,319
(55) Editor 1 $72,774
(56) Maintenance Coordinator 1 $72,774
(57) Research Project Analyst 1 $72,774
(58) Buyer 3 $69,975
(59) HEI Program Coordinator 4 $69,975
01/27/2025 1:41:07 PM HAR027

HB1264
(60) Occupational Safety Coordinator 1 $69,975
(61) Administrative Support Pool 48
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(62) Assistant Registrar 2 $67,284
(63) Library Support Pool 4
Library Supervisor $67,284
Library Specialist $57,515
Library Technician $53,175
Library Support Assistant $49,164
(64) Commercial Graphic Artist 2 $64,696
(65) Financial Aid Specialist 2 $62,208
(66) Human Resources Specialist 3 $62,208
(67) Maintenance Specialist 2 $59,815
(68) Research Assistant 1 $59,815
(69) Special Events Coordinator 1 $59,815
(70) Maintenance Assistant 4 $51,130
(71) Mail Services Coordinator 1 $49,164
(72) Registrar's Assistant 4 $49,164
(73) Institutional Services Supervisor 7 $43,706
(74) Institutional Services Assistant 10 $42,025
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(75) Faculty 25
Professor $197,881
Assistant Professor $156,658
Instructor $128,780
(76) Department Chairperson 20 $192,886
(77) Director of Library Services 1 $183,591
01/27/2025 1:41:07 PM HAR027

HB1264
(78) Librarian 7 $132,579
(79) Clinical Instructor 6 $99,620
NINE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(80) Faculty 240
Distinguished Professor $212,395
Professor $186,326
Associate Professor $163,351
Assistant Professor $136,756
Instructor $106,699
Lecturer $89,546
(81) Clinical Instructor 10 $79,611
(82) Part-Time Faculty 300 $56,046
(83) Graduate Assistant 1 $35,147
TWELVE MONTH AUXILIARY ENTERPRISES
POSITIONS
(84) Project/Program Administrator 6
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(85) Director of Athletics 1 $159,847
(86) Coach 8 $146,048
(87) Director of Auxiliary Enterprises 1 $140,297
(88) Assistant Director of Athletics 1 $122,257
(89) Senior Women's Sports Administrator 1 $122,257
(90) Assistant Coach 10 $114,807
(91) Head Athletic Trainer 1 $114,807
(92) Director of Student Activities 1 $100,904
(93) Academic Advisor 1 $83,172
(94) Sports Information Director 1 $77,184
(95) Compliance Officer 1 $73,767
(96) Residential Life Coordinator 2 $73,767
01/27/2025 1:41:07 PM HAR027

HB1264
(97) Administrative Support Pool 3
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(98) Assistant Athletic Trainer 2 $49,549
WESTERN ARKANSAS AREA TECHNICAL CENTER
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(99) Dir. Western Arkansas Area Tech Ctr. 1 $135,512
(100) Asst. Dir. Western Ark Area Tech Ctr. 1 $119,914
(101) Workforce Specialist 1 $93,055
(102) Academic Advisor 2 $77,184
(103) Administrative Support Pool 1
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
NINE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(104) Faculty 10 $111,361
(105) Part-Time Faculty 10 $56,046
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1,025

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the University of Arkansas - Fort Smith for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
01/27/2025 1:41:07 PM HAR027

HB1264
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: nine
hundred ten (910) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of
pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the University of Arkansas - Fort Smith, to be payable from
the University of Arkansas at Fort Smith Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the University of Arkansas - Fort Smith for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $19,273,410
(02) EXTRA HELP 500,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 3,600,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 2,600,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) FUNDED DEPRECIATION 20,000
(06) CONTINGENCY 1,299,671
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $27,293,081

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the University of Arkansas - Fort Smith, to be payable from cash funds as
defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services and operating
expenses of the University of Arkansas - Fort Smith for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
01/27/2025 1:41:07 PM HAR027

HB1264
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $25,000,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 1,155,000
(03) OVERTIME 50,000
(04) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 8,000,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 25,000,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 600,000
(C) PROF. FEES 1,600,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 5,250,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 31,500,000
(07) DEBT SERVICE 8,000,000
(08) FUND TRANSFERS, REFUNDS AND
INVESTMENTS 12,000,000
(09) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 125,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $118,280,000

SECTION 5. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, the Higher Education Expenditure Restriction
Act, or their successors, and other fiscal control laws of this State, where
applicable, and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 6. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.
01/27/2025 1:41:07 PM HAR027

HB1264

SECTION 7. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.
























01/27/2025 1:41:07 PM HAR027